src/fst/morphology/stems/interjections.lexc
!! # Interjections

LEXICON ij
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
+Interj: # ; !!= - @CODE@ 

LEXICON Interjections
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
fakamolemole ij "sorry" ; !!= - @CODE@ 
fakafetai ij "thank you" ; !!= - @CODE@ 
aho ij "good afternoon" ; !!= - @CODE@ 
afiafi ij "good evening" ; !!= - @CODE@ 
mâlô ij "greeting" ; !!= - @CODE@ 
tâlofa ij "greeting" ; !!= - @CODE@ 
hāloa ij "what a pity" ; !!= - @CODE@ 
!! That was all interjections
